Oklahoma, session 2025, SB387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 272, O.S.L.
2022 (74 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 5060.44), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 5060.44. A. As used in this section:
1. “Applicant organization” means an Oklahoma-based entity that
is a nonprofit research foundation or private enterprise of special
importance to the Oklahoma economy; and
2. “Eligible student” means an individual currently enrolled in
a technology center school under the governance of the State Board
of Career and Technology Education or an individual currently
enrolled in an undergraduate or graduate program at an institution
of higher education who is majoring in a science, technology,
engineering, and mathematics (STEM) based discipline including, but
not limited to, natural sciences, computer science, materials
science, engineering, biomedical, biotechnical, data analytics,

finance, mathematics, or a support area related to building
successful Oklahoma high-tech companies.
B. There is hereby created the Oklahoma Center for the
Advancement of Science and Technology Intern Partnership for STEM
Workforce Pipeline Program to be administered by the Oklahoma Center
for the Advancement of Science and Technology under the governance
of the Oklahoma Science and Technology Research and Development
Board.
C. The Oklahoma Center for the Advancement of Science and
Technology may award competitive internship funds, through
professional service contracts, to applicant organizations to hire
qualified student interns to participate in innovative industry
projects.
D. To qualify for program internship funds, the applicant
organization must provide:
1. Documentation verifying that not less than fifty percent
(50%) of the total direct cost of the proposed project will be
provided by sources other than the Oklahoma Center for the
Advancement of Science and Technology and other state-appropriated
money. Such sources may be in the form of salary, cash, nonstate
grant funds, and other sources of funding as defined by the Oklahoma
Center for the Advancement of Science and Technology;
2. A description of the potential commercial application of and
the industrial sectors that will likely benefit from the project and
the potential to enhance employment opportunities in Oklahoma;
3. An itemized research budget, timeline, and research
methodology; and
4. Any other information that may be required by the Board.
E. The Board shall award professional service contracts after
it determines the applicant organization:
1. Provides a beneficial and meaningful intern experience which
includes exposure to real-world application of technology and
innovation activities;
ENR. S. B. NO. 387 Page 2

2. Involves projects leading to innovation, new knowledge, or
technology that will benefit the applicant organization;
3. Has a reasonable probability to enhance employment
opportunities within Oklahoma;
4. Is technically sound, will produce a measurable result, and
will provide a positive impact to the applicant organization; and
5. Does not involve market surveys or research activities that
create fundamental or basic information which lack the potential for
reasonably short-term commercialization.
F. Based upon the information submitted by the applicant
organization, external peer review, and such additional
investigation as the staff of the Center shall make, the Board may
approve such professional service contracts after the Board finds
that:
1. The proposed project is research that leads to innovation,
new knowledge, or technology and is not training or technical
assistance for business firms;
2. The project has a reasonable probability to enhance
employment opportunities within the state; and
3. The project is technically sound and will produce a
measurable result.
G. The Oklahoma Center for the Advancement of Science and
Technology shall promulgate rules necessary to implement and
administer the program authorized in this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 387 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 10th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 387 Page 4